Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 412.007 is amended to read:
412.007. (1) The eligibility for and amount of aid to be granted for  any dependent child or rela-
tive pursuant to ORS 412.006 shall be determined, in accordance with the rules of the Department
of Human Services, taking into account:
(a) The income, resources and maintenance available to such child and relative from whatever
source derived, allowable deductions and the statewide income and payment standards.
(b) The income and financial condition of  the stepparent, if any, of the child for whom aid is
sought.
(2) Subsection (1)(b) of this section is not intended to relieve any parent of any legal  obligation
with respect to the support of the natural or adopted children of the parent.
(3) In determining the eligibility for and amount of aid to be granted  under subsection (1) of this
section and under ORS 411.070, the department shall  disregard:
(a) [Disregard ] From income,  no less than $50 of the amount of child support received for each
child per month, up to a total of $200 or the maximum established by federal law, for the  family;
[and]
(b) As resources, moneys held in a pension or retirement account; and
[(b)] (c)  [Disregard ] Any earnings or other [ amounts of] income [ and] or resources of the  family
as the department may prescribe by rule.
(4) As used in this section, “pension and retirement account” includes:
(a) Benefits employees receive only when they retire or leave employment;
(b) Pension, profit-sharing and  stock bonus plans exempt from taxation by section 401
of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Qualified annuities exempt from taxation by section 403(a) or (b) of the Internal Re-
venue Code;
(d) Accounts or annuities exempt from taxation by section 408(a), (b), (c), (k), (p)  or (q)
of the Internal Revenue Code;
(e) Roth individual retirement plans authorized by section 408A of the Internal Revenue
Code;
(f) Retirement plans offered by governments, nonprofit organizations  or unions that are:
Enrolled House Bill 4079 (HB 4079-INTRO) Page 1
(A) Exempt from taxation under section 457(b) or 501(c)(18) of the Internal Revenue Code;
or
(B) Contributions to the Thrift Savings Fund authorized by 5 U.S.C. 8439; and
(g) Defined contribution plan accounts described in ORS 178.210.
Passed by House March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4079 (HB 4079-INTRO) Page 2